Tennessee, session 114, HB2215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-1-305, is amended by adding the
following new subdivision (13):
(A) Notwithstanding §§ 70-1-301(a) and 70-6-101(a), enter into agreements with
local law enforcement agencies for the limited purpose of assisting the agency with the
enforcement of this title, rules promulgated by the fish and wildlife commission, and
proclamations passed by the fish and wildlife commission;
(B) Such agreements must be limited in scope to assisting with matters of public
safety specific to human wildlife interaction such as feeding of wildlife and interaction
with wildlife that could cause a public safety concern. The agreements must specify the
laws, rules, or proclamations the local law enforcement agency is authorized to enforce
and cite; and
(C) The agreements created and entered into pursuant to this subdivision (13)
must require local law enforcement agencies to provide regular reports to the executive
director, or the director's designee, when the authority under the agreement is exercised.
Such reporting must include, but not be limited to, all details related to the citation,
including the facts of the offense, and the final disposition.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 70, Chapter 4, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following new section:
HB2215
012442
- 1 -

(a) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, it is an offense to feed black
bears within the confines of an area for which the commission has proclaimed that
feeding black bears is prohibited.
(b) Knowingly feeding a black bear in violation of subsection (a) is a Class B
misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of no less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250),
before the imposition of any additional court costs or fees.
(c) Unknowingly feeding a black bear in violation of subsection (a), that occurs
as a result of knowingly leaving food or garbage unsecured and otherwise accessible to
black bears, is a Class B misdemeanor, punishable by:
(1) For a first offense, a written warning only; or
(2) For a second or subsequent offense, a fine of no less than two
hundred fifty dollars ($250), before the imposition of any additional court costs or
fees.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to acts or omissions occurring on or after such date.
- 2 - 012442